Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-85] Well completion report.
Within thirty days after the completion of the well, the well driller and pump
installation contractor shall file with the commission a written report
containing such information prescribed by the commission, including, as
appropriate: the depth, thickness, and character of the different strata
penetrated and the location of water-bearing strata; the date of completion of
the well; the length, size, and weight of the casing and a description of the
placement of the casing; the size of the drilled hole; where the well is sealed
off; the type of seal; the number of cubic feet per second or gallons per
minute of flow from the well; the pressure in pounds per square inch, if a
flowing well, and the static water level and water temperature, if a nonflowing
well; and a chemical analysis of a water sample drawn from the well. [L 1987, c
45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next